Massachusetts, session 194th, H5136.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 1. (a) For any ordinances enacted by the city of Newton, which are not 
inconsistent with the laws of the Commonwealth, the city of Newton may affix penalties for the 
breach thereof not exceeding two thousand ($2,000) dollars. 
(b) The maximum penalty set forth herein shall be adjusted for inflation, rounded to the 
nearest one hundred ($100) dollars, on January 1, 2026, and on January 1 every five (5) years 
thereafter, based on the annual percentage change in the United States Department of Labor, 
Bureau of Labor Statistics, Consumer Price Index for all Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the 
Boston-Cambridge-Newton, Mass.-N.H. Core Based Statistical Area, all items or its successor 
index. 
Section 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.